Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.340

Prohibited practices.

It is a violation of this chapter for any licensee, executive officer, responsible individual, or other person subject to this chapter in connection with the provision of money services to:

(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead any person, including but not limited to engaging in bait and switch advertising or sales practices;

(2) Directly or indirectly engage in any unfair or deceptive act or practice toward any person, including but not limited to any false or deceptive statement about fees or other terms of a money transmission or currency exchange;

(3) Directly or indirectly obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

(4) Knowingly make, publish, or disseminate any false, deceptive, or misleading information in the provision of money services;

(5) Knowingly receive or take possession for personal use of any property of any money services business, other than in payment for services rendered, and with intent to defraud, omit to make, or cause or direct to omit to make, a full and true entry thereof in the books and accounts of the business;

(6) Make or concur in making any false entry, or omit or concur in omitting any material entry, in the books or accounts of the business;

(7) Knowingly make or publish to the director or director's designee, or concur in making or publishing to the director or director's designee any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition containing any material statement which is false, or omit or concur in omitting any statement required by law to be contained therein; or

(8) Fail to make any report or statement lawfully required by the director or other public official.

[ 2003 c 287 s 36.]